District of Columbia statutes.
2-113

Use deemed nuisance; proceedings to abate.

The use of any steam boiler or unfired pressure vessel in violation of any of the prohibitions or requirements of this subchapter, or of the regulations promulgated under the authority hereof, shall constitute a common nuisance and the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia may maintain an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of the District of Columbia, to abate and perpetually enjoin such nuisance.

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1919, ch. 802, § 12
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(2)
1981 Ed., § 1-1013.
1973 Ed., § 1-713.